src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-o_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # raklo o-stem
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: raklo
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: rakles
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: rakleske
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: raklesta
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: rakleha
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: raklesko
    raklo+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [rakleskiiro, rakleskiiri, rakleskiire]
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: rakle
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: raklen
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: raklenge
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: raklenna
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: raklensa
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: raklengo
    raklo+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [raklengiiro, raklengiiri, raklengiire]
	
